North Carolina statutes. Chapter 106. Agriculture.
Part 6. Cattle Tick.

§ 106-351.
Systematic dipping of cattle or horses.

Systematic dipping of all cattle or horses infested with or exposed to the cattle tick (Margaropus annulatus) shall be taken up in all counties or portions of counties that shall at any time be found partially or completely infested with the cattle tick (Margaropus annulatus) under the direction of the State Veterinarian acting under the authority as hereinafter provided in

G.S. 106-351

to 106-363 and as provided in all other laws and parts of laws of North Carolina and the livestock sanitary laws and regulations of the State Board of Agriculture not in conflict with

G.S. 106-351

to 106-363.

History.

1923, c. 146, s. 1; C.S., s. 4895(p).

Legal Periodicals.

See 1 N.C.L. Rev. 301 (1923).

§ 106-352.
Counties not embraced in quarantine zones.

If it shall be determined by the State Veterinarian or an authorized quarantine inspector, that any county or counties shall be partially or completely infested with the cattle tick (Margaropus annulatus), the county commissioners of said counties which are partially or completely infested with the cattle tick (Margaropus annulatus) shall immediately take up the work of systematic tick eradication as hereafter provided and continue same until the cattle tick (Margaropus annulatus) is completely eradicated and notice in writing of same is given by the State Veterinarian.

History.

1923, c. 146, s. 3; C.S., s. 4895(r).

§ 106-353.
Dipping vats; counties to provide; cost.

The county commissioners of the aforesaid counties shall provide such numbers of dipping vats as may be fixed by the State Veterinarian or his authorized representative, and provide the proper chemicals and other materials necessary to be used in the work of systematic tick eradication in such counties, which shall begin on said dates and continue until the cattle tick (Margaropus annulatus) is completely eradicated and notice in writing of same is given by the State Veterinarian. The cost of said vats and chemicals, or any other expense incurred in carrying out the provisions of

G.S. 106-351

to 106-363, except

G.S. 106-354

and 106-358, shall be paid out of the general county fund.

History.

1923, c. 146, s. 4; C.S., s. 4895(s).

§ 106-354.
Local State inspectors; commissioned as quarantine inspectors; salaries, etc.

The State Veterinarian shall appoint the necessary number of local State inspectors to assist in systematic tick eradication, who shall be commissioned by the Commissioner of Agriculture as quarantine inspectors. The salaries of said inspectors shall be sufficient to insure the employment of competent men. If the service of any of said inspectors is not satisfactory to the State Veterinarian, his services shall be immediately discontinued and his commission canceled.

History.

1923, c. 146, s. 5; C.S., s. 4895(t); 1925, c. 275, s. 6.

§ 106-355.
Enforcement of compliance with law.

If the county commissioners shall fail, refuse or neglect to comply with the provisions of

G.S. 106-351

to 106-363, the State Veterinarian shall apply to any court of competent jurisdiction for a writ of mandamus, or shall institute such other proceedings as may be necessary and proper to compel such county commissioners to comply with the provisions of

G.S. 106-351

to 106-363.

History.

1923, c. 146, s. 6; C.S., s. 4895(u).

§ 106-356.
Owners of stock to have same dipped; supervision of dipping; dipping period.

Any person or persons, firms or corporations, owning or having in charge any cattle, horses or mules in any county where tick eradication shall be taken up, or is in progress under existing laws, shall, on notification by any quarantine inspector to do so, have such cattle, horses or mules dipped regularly every 14 days in a vat properly charged with arsenical solution as recommended by the United States Bureau of Animal Industry, under the supervision of said inspector at such time and place and in such manner as may be designated by the quarantine inspector. The dipping period shall be continued as long as may be required by the rules and regulations of the State Board of Agriculture, which shall be sufficient in number and length of time to completely destroy and eradicate all cattle ticks (Margaropus annulatus) in such county or counties.

History.

1923, c. 146, s. 7; C.S., s. 4895(v).

§ 106-357.
Service of notice.

Quarantine and dipping notice for cattle, horses and mules, the owner or owners of which cannot be found, shall be served by posting copy of such notice in not less than three public places within the county, one of which shall be placed at the county courthouse. Such posting shall be due and legal notice.

History.

1923, c. 146, s. 8; C.S., s. 4895(w).

§ 106-358.
Cattle placed in quarantine; dipping at expense of owner.

Cattle, horses or mules infested with or exposed to the cattle tick (Margaropus annulatus) the owner or owners of which, after five days’ written notice from a quarantine inspector of such animals as is provided for in

G.S. 106-357

, shall fail or refuse to dip such animals regularly every 14 days in a vat properly charged with arsenical solution, as recommended by the United States Bureau of Animal Industry, under the supervision of a quarantine inspector, shall be placed in quarantine, dipped and cared for at the expense of the owner or owners, by the quarantine inspector.

History.

1923, c. 146, s. 9; C.S., s. 4895(x).

§ 106-359.
Expense of dipping as lien on animals; enforcement of lien.

Any expense incurred in the enforcement of

G.S. 106-358

and the cost of feeding and caring for animals while undergoing the process of tick eradication shall constitute a lien upon any animal, and should the owner or owners fail or refuse to pay said expense, after three days’ notice, they shall be sold by the sheriff of the county after 20 days’ advertising at the courthouse door and three other public places in the immediate neighborhood of the place at which the animal was taken up for the purpose of tick eradication. The said advertisement shall state therein the time and place of sale, which place shall be where the animal is confined. The sale shall be at public auction and to the highest bidder for cash. Out of the proceeds of the sale the sheriff shall pay the cost of publishing the notices of the tick-eradication process, including dipping, cost of feeding and caring for the animals and cost of the sale, which shall include one dollar and fifty cents ($1.50) in the case of each sale to said sheriff. The surplus, if any, shall be paid to the owner of the animal if he can be ascertained. If he cannot be ascertained within 30 days after such sale, then the sheriff shall pay such surplus to the county treasurer for the benefit of the public school fund of the county: Provided, however, that if the owner of the animal shall, within 12 months after the fund is turned over to the county treasurer, as aforesaid, prove to the satisfaction of the board of county commissioners of the county that he was the owner of such animal, then, upon the order of said board, such surplus shall be refunded to the owner.

History.

1923, c. 146, s. 10; C.S., s. 4895(y).

§ 106-360.
Duty of sheriff.

It shall be the duty of the sheriff, in any county in which the work of tick eradication is in progress, to render all quarantine inspectors any assistance necessary in the enforcement of

G.S. 106-351

to 106-363 and the regulations of the North Carolina Department of Agriculture and Consumer Services. If the sheriff of any county shall neglect, fail or refuse to render his assistance when so required, he shall be guilty of a Class 1 misdemeanor.

History.

1923, c. 146, s. 11; C.S., s. 4895(z); 1993, c. 539, s. 771; 1994, Ex. Sess., c. 24, s. 14(c); 1997-261, s. 109.

§ 106-361.
Rules and regulations.

The Commissioner of Agriculture, by and with the consent of the State Board of Agriculture, shall have full power to promulgate and enforce such rules and regulations that may hereafter be necessary to complete tick eradication in North Carolina.

History.

1923, c. 146, s. 12; C.S., s. 4895(aa).

§ 106-362.
Penalty for violation.

Any person, firm or corporation who shall violate any provisions set forth in

G.S. 106-351

to 106-363 or any rule or regulation duly established by the State Board of Agriculture, or any officer or inspector who shall willfully fail to comply with any provision of

G.S. 106-351

to 106-363 shall be guilty of a Class 1 misdemeanor.

History.

1923, c. 146, s. 13; C.S., s. 4895(bb); 1993, c. 539, s. 772; 1994, Ex. Sess., c. 24, s. 14(c).

§ 106-363.
Damaging dipping vats a felony.

Any person or persons who shall willfully damage or destroy by any means any vat erected, or in the process of being erected, as provided for tick eradication, shall be guilty of a Class H felony.

History.

1923, c. 146, s. 14; C.S., s. 4895(cc); 1993, c. 539, s. 1296; 1994, Ex. Sess., c. 24, s. 14(c).